California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The decision may include an order revoking or suspending the license held by the licensee, or affixing such other conditional and probationary orders as may be proper for the enforcement of this chapter or any provision of any stabilization and marketing plan formulated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or of any regulation adopted by the director pursuant to Section 61891.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62154.

After any decision, which includes any conditional or probationary orders, if the respondent does not comply with any such orders, the director may suspend or revoke the license in accordance with the procedure which is provided in this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62155.

Whenever the director is satisfied, either by investigation or after a hearing, that a handler is unable to pay for any market milk purchased from any producer, and is further satisfied that to permit the handler to continue to purchase and receive any market milk from producers would be likely to cause serious and irreparable loss to producer-creditors and other producers, the director may thereupon and forthwith shorten the time for hearing that is provided for in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, and thereupon may issue an order to show cause why the license of such handler should not be forthwith suspended or revoked. The time of notice of the hearing shall not, however, be less than five days. At such hearing the handler that is proceeded against shall be ordered to show cause why the license should not be suspended or revoked, or continued under such conditions and provisions, if any, as the director may consider just and proper and for the protection of the best interests of the producer-creditors and producers from whom the handler has been and is receiving any market milk. Following such hearing, the decision of the director shall become effective at his discretion.

The hearing, in the case of such emergency, may be called upon written notice which is served personally or by mail on the handler that is involved. It may be held at the nearest office of the director or at such place as may be most convenient in the discretion of the director for the attendance of all of the parties that are involved.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Bonding and Payment for Market Milk [62181. - 62202.]

62181.

The bonds provided for in this article are required for each handler and apply to all purchases of milk by that handler. A handler bonded under this article is not required to be separately bonded under Section 61405.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 36.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62182.

(a) Every handler that operates only one plant within the state, before purchasing any market milk from a producer, shall execute and deliver to the secretary a surety bond, executed by the applicant as principal and by a surety company qualified and authorized to do business in this state as surety. The minimum amount of the bond shall be based upon the average daily quantity of market milk purchased by the handler during any calendar month during a calendar year.

The minimum amount of the bond shall be as follows:

(1) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for any handler that purchases an average daily quantity of less than 1,000 gallons.

(2) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for any handler that purchases an average daily quantity of at least 1,000 gallons but less than 4,000 gallons.

(3) Fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for any handler that purchases an average daily quantity of at least 4,000 gallons but less than 8,000 gallons.

(4) Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for any handler that purchases an average daily quantity of 8,000 gallons or more.

(b) Every handler that operates more than one plant within the state, before purchasing any market milk from a producer, shall execute and deliver to the secretary a surety bond, executed by the applicant as principal and by a surety company qualified and authorized to do business in this state as surety. The bond shall be a single bond covering all plants within the state and shall be in an amount determined by multiplying twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) by the number of plants operated by the handler in the state.

(c) Any milk purchase agreement between a handler and a producer may provide for additional surety bonds, guarantees, or other forms of security in addition to the bonding requirements in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 70, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

62183.

If any handler so increases his purchases of market milk during the license year that such purchases exceed the amount for which the handler is bonded, such handler shall forthwith post such additional bond as may be required to comply with this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62184.

The bonds required by Sections 62182 and 62183 shall be upon a form approved by the director, and shall be conditioned upon the payment in the manner that is required by this chapter, of all amounts due to producers for market milk purchased by such licensee or applicant during the license year. It shall be to the state in favor of every producer of market milk.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62185.

If a handler fails to pay any producer or producers for market milk in the manner that is required by this chapter, the director shall proceed forthwith to ascertain the names and addresses of all the producers that the handler has failed to pay, together with the amounts due and owing to them and each of them by such handler, and shall request all such producers to file a verified statement of their respective claims with the director. The producer need only verify that he is owed an amount by the handler. The actual amount in such case may be ascertained by the director.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62186.

After determining the claims of such producers, the director shall bring an action on the bond on behalf of such producers.

Any producer not satisfied with the amount of such producer’s claim as determined by the director, or with the ratio such producer’s claim bears to all claims against the bond as determined by the director, may intervene in such an action so that the correct amount of his claim and the ratio it bears to all the claims may be adjudicated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62186.1.

(a) The director may bring an action against a surety bond company if the company fails to do any of the following:

(1) Acknowledge promptly and act reasonably upon receiving a bond demand from the director.

(2) Promptly investigate and process claims.

(3) Make fair and equitable settlement of claims.

(4) Pay the bond amount to the director.

(b) The authority provided in subdivision (a) is in addition to the authority provided for in subdivision (h) of Section 790.03 of the Insurance Code.

(c) In addition to the bond proceeds, the surety bond company may be ordered to pay interest at the prevailing prime rate on the amounts owed from the date the claim was filed, all the department’s court costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1074, Sec. 15.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62187.

If a handler fails to pay any producer in the manner that is required by this chapter, the director may require the filing of a new or additional bond in an amount determined by the director that will be sufficient to satisfy claims for the payment of producers thereafter supplying market milk to the handler. The failure of a handler to have filed a new bond within 10 days after notice from the director constitutes grounds for the revocation or suspension of the license of the handler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 39.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62188.

If recovery upon the bond is not sufficient to pay all of the claims as finally determined and adjudged by the court, any such amount recovered shall be divided pro rata among the producer-creditors.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62189.

The failure of any handler that purchases market milk from producers to execute and deliver the bond as provided and required in this article is a violation of this chapter. The failure of any such handler to post any additional bond as may be required to comply with any provision of this chapter is also a violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62190.

Payments by a handler to a producer, for the purposes of any action on a handler’s bond or bonds for any year or years, shall be credited first to interest and then to principal due, owing, and unpaid. Amounts to be applied to principal shall be applied first to the amount due for the most recent deliveries and then successively, in descending order, to the amounts due to the next most recent deliveries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62191.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 62193 or 62194, the purchase of any market milk in excess of 1,000 gallons monthly from any producer is an unlawful trade practice unless a written contract, which complies with all of the requirements which are prescribed by this section, has been entered into with the producer. 

(b) The contract shall include all of the following: 

(1) The amount of market milk which is to be purchased for any period. 

(2) The minimum quantity of the market milk which is to be paid for as class 1, if any is to be purchased for this purpose. The quantity shall be stated in pounds of market milk, pounds of market milk fat, or gallons of market milk, unless the price which is to be paid for the class 1 market milk is established separately for the market milk fat and market skim milk, in which case the quantity may, in the alternative, be stated in both pounds of market milk fat and pounds of market skim milk separately. The minimum quantity of market milk to be paid for as class 1 shall not be less than 70 percent of the total quantity provided in the contract to be purchased at a milk products plant, and not less than 60 percent of the total quantity of market milk fat, or the total quantity of market skim milk components, but not necessarily both, provided in the contract to be purchased at a country plant, as defined by the director in stabilization and marketing plans. 

(3) The price to be paid for all market milk received. 

(4) The date and method of payment for the market milk. Payment shall be made for the amount of the market milk delivered during the first 15 days of any calendar month not later than the first day of the next following month and for the amount delivered during the remainder of the month not later than the 15th day of the next following month unless the milk is subject to a pooling plan as authorized in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 62700) and the pooling plan provides for different dates and methods of payment, in which case the date and method of payment for the milk shall be as provided for in the pooling plan. 

(5) The charges for transportation if hauled by the handler. 

(6) A provision that market milk received within the total quantity provided by the contract to be purchased for any period shall not be paid for at less than the minimum price for market milk used for class 2.

(c) The contract may contain other provisions that are not in conflict with this chapter. A signed copy of the contract shall be filed by the producer with the director within five days from the date of its execution. 

(d) Paragraphs (2) and (6) of subdivision (b) shall not be applicable if an equalization pool, as provided pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 62700), is in effect for the area in which the purchase of the market milk occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1101, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

62192.

The production of market milk in excess of amounts provided to be purchased under contracts executed pursuant to Section 62191 shall be voluntary on the part of the producer and shall not be a condition, oral or written, of execution or renewal of any of those contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 41.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62193.

Section 62191 does not apply to the purchase of market milk which is necessary to meet an unanticipated increase in demand or an unanticipated shortage in the supply of a handler if both of the following occur:

(a) The quantity of market milk purchased from any one producer does not exceed 5,000 gallons in any one month. However, if the producer is a cooperative association acting as a producer, the total quantity purchased shall not exceed 30,000 gallons per month. 

(b) A complete record of all of these purchases is kept by the handler, and the price paid for the milk by the handler is not less than the price which is established in the applicable stabilization and marketing plan for the usage to which the milk is applied. For a single transaction between a producer and handler, payment shall be made for the amount of milk delivered during the first 15 days of any calendar month not later than the first day of the next following month and payment shall be made for the amount of milk delivered during the remainder of the month not later than the 15th day of the next following month, unless the milk is subject to a pooling plan as authorized in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 62700) and the pooling plan provides for different dates and methods of payment, in which case the date and method of payment for the milk shall be as provided for in the pooling plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1101, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

62194.

Section 62191 does not apply to market milk purchased under cash-on-delivery terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 43.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62195.

The payment by a handler to any producer, including any nonprofit cooperative association acting as a producer, or the receipt from a handler by a producer, including any nonprofit cooperative association acting as a producer, of a lesser price for any market milk distributed to any person, including any agency of federal, state, or local government, for less than the minimum prices established by the director to be paid by handlers to producers for market milk for the marketing area is an unlawful trade practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1074, Sec. 18.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62196.

The failure of any handler to pay for market milk delivered to him or her at the time and in the manner specified in the contract with the producer is an unlawful trade practice, except as provided for in Section 62079.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

62197.

This article applies regardless of the form in which market milk is received by the handler and regardless of the area of origin of the market milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 46.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62198.

Any contract between a producer and handler is voidable by the producer for a 45-day period following the occurrence of either of the following events:

(a) The handler has failed to pay the producer the full price specified in the contract or has failed to comply with the terms specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 62191, and the failure has not been corrected by the handler within one business day after notification by the producer or director. The 45-day period shall commence on the day after the payment was due.

(b) The handler has failed on three separate occasions within a 12-month period to pay the producer the full price specified in the contract or has failed to comply with the terms specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 62191. The 45-day period shall commence on the day after the third occurrence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1074, Sec. 19.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62199.

If a notice has been issued by the director that the future deliveries to the handler will not be covered under the Milk Producers Security Trust Fund created pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 62500), all contracts between producers and the handler are voidable by the producers. Producers shall have the option to void their contracts for a 45-day period from the date the notice is issued or until the date the director establishes for reinstatement of the handler’s eligibility under the trust fund, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1074, Sec. 20.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62200.

(a) Handlers shall pay producers either by check or cash. Handlers electing to pay producers by cash shall, in all cases, obtain a dated, signed receipt from each producer. The receipts shall be made a part of the permanent records of the handler. Handlers paying by check shall issue checks which are reduceable to cash by the producer in no more than one business day.

(b) The giving of a promissory note is not payment within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1074, Sec. 21.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62201.

(a) If a handler does not pay for market milk delivered to him or her at the time and in the manner specified in the contract, the handler shall pay the producer interest on the unpaid amount from the time the payment was due until paid at the rate of 12 percent per annum. This interest is in addition to any other penalties provided in this chapter. 

(b) If there is no contract for the delivery of milk to the handler or the delivery was made as a single transaction between the producer or handler, the handler shall pay the department interest on the unpaid amount from the time the payment was due until paid at the interest rate specified in subdivision (a). The interest is in addition to any other penalties provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1101, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

62202.

If a handler fails to pay for market milk delivered to him or her at the time and in the manner specified in this chapter, the director may assess a penalty for each payment date that producers were not fully paid. Any penalty assessed shall be a minimum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each payment date. If the amount not properly paid is in excess of forty thousand dollars ($40,000), the penalty assessed will be five thousand dollars ($5,000) or one-fourth of 1 percent of the amount not properly paid for, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1074, Sec. 23.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Administrative Fees [62211. - 62213.]

62211.

(a) (1) Every handler subject to the provisions of any stabilization and marketing plan, including a producer-handler, shall deduct as an assessment from payments made to producers for market milk, including the handler’s own production, the sum of one and six-tenths cents ($0.016) per hundredweight of market milk.

(2) The amount of the assessments so deducted shall be paid to the secretary on or before the 45th day following the last day of the month during which such market milk was received.

 (b) (1) Every handler subject to the provisions of
 any stabilization and marketing plan that purchases or handles market milk from producers, including the handler’s own production, if
 any, shall pay a fee of eight-tenths of one cent ($0.008) per hundredweight of market milk.

(2) The amount of such fee shall be paid to the secretary on or before the 45th day following the last day of the month in which that market milk was received.

(c) Moneys from the amounts paid to the secretary pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) may be used to administer and enforce this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 260, Sec. 9.   (AB 1894)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

62212.

The director may fix the rates of assessments or fees required by Section 62211 at lesser amounts, and may adjust the rates of assessments or fees from time to time, whenever he or she finds that the cost of administering the provisions of this chapter, including any allocation of funds made pursuant to Section 38986, can be defrayed from revenues derived from the lower rates. However, the rate of assessments deducted from payments to producers for market milk, including the handler’s own production, and the rate of fees paid by handlers shall, at all times, be in the ratio of 2 to 1, except that this ratio need not be achieved during a six-month period following the transfer of any fund surplus pursuant to Section 62574.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

62213.

Any assessment or fee or either of them payable pursuant to any provision of this article is a debt of the person by whom such assessment or fee or either of them is payable and shall be due and payable to the director upon the date set forth in Section 62211. If such person does not pay such assessment or fee or either of them upon the required date, the director may file a complaint against such person in a state court of competent jurisdiction for the collection of such assessment or fee or either of them.

If any such person does not pay to the director the assessments or fees or either of them provided for in this article, on or before the date specified in Section 62211, the director may add to such unpaid assessments or fees or either of them an amount not exceeding 10 percent of such unpaid assessment or fees or either of them to defray the cost of enforcing the collection of such unpaid assessments or fees or either of them.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Reports and Statistics [62241. - 62243.]

62241.

All handlers shall make and file with the director at least once each month such reports as the director may require to enable him to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62241.5.

Within 60 days of the effective date of this section, each market milk handler shall provide the director with a list of the name, address, and date of every current contract between the handler and market milk producer. Monthly thereafter, the handler shall report to the director the same information on all terminated, new, and amended contracts which has not been previously reported. The director may assess a one hundred dollar ($100) penalty against any market milk handler who fails to file the required report for each report not filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1074, Sec. 24.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62242.

Every handler that purchases market milk shall make and keep for three years a correct record which shows in detail all of the following with reference to the handling, sale, or storage of the market milk:

(a) The name and address of the seller.

(b) The date the market milk was received.

(c) The amount of market milk received.

(d) The official tests of the market milk purchased.

(e) The usage of the market milk.

(f) Evidence of payment for the market milk purchased.

(g) Other records that the director may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 53.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62243.

Any record or report made to the director pursuant to this article, or any contract required to be filed under this chapter, is confidential and shall not be divulged, except if necessary for the proper determination of any court proceedings or hearing before the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 54.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Local and Regional Producer Advisory Boards [62301. - 62313.]

62301.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 62303, the director may, if he deems such board necessary or advisable, appoint:

(a) A local advisory board for any marketing area established as prescribed in this chapter to assist and advise him in matters which pertain to the production and marketing of market milk or to the operation of a stabilization and marketing plan.

(b) A regional advisory board, if he deems such board necessary or advisable to represent several marketing areas adjacent to each other and wherein production conditions and costs are reasonably uniform.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62302.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 62303, the director shall appoint:

(a) A local advisory board, if a majority of the producers individually, or through any nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing association which is authorized by its members to so petition, request the establishment of such board. 

(b) A regional advisory board, if in each marketing area which is involved a majority of producers that supply such marketing areas individually, or through any nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing association which is authorized by its members to so petition, requests that such a board be established.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62303.

The director shall not establish any local or regional advisory board pursuant to this article if he finds that the assessments or fees which are collected pursuant to Article 14 (commencing with Section 62211) of this chapter from the marketing area are insufficient to cover the costs of such local or regional advisory board.

No regional advisory board shall be set up to include any marketing area which on September 7, 1955, was operating under a local advisory board, unless by petition as provided for in this article or through public hearing, producers of such marketing area request that they be represented by a regional advisory board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62304.

If the director receives a qualified petition for a local advisory board, he may investigate the possibility of establishing a regional advisory board covering the marketing area from which the petition was received and the adjacent marketing areas, by holding one or more public hearings for the purpose of establishing whether or not a majority of producers supplying the marketing areas proposed to be included in such region desire such regional advisory board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62305.

A local advisory board established pursuant to this article shall consist of seven members who shall be producers that supply market milk to the particular marketing area. A regional advisory board may consist of any number of members who are producers that supply market milk to any of the marketing areas in the region, but shall consist of not less than one member from each such marketing area in the region. The director may appoint one additional member on each such board who shall be a public member.

Upon the director’s request, each board shall submit to the director the names of three or more natural persons, each of whom shall be a citizen and resident of this state and not a producer, shipper, or processor nor financially interested in any producer, shipper, or processor, for appointment by the director as a public member of the board. The director may appoint one of the nominees as the public member on the board. If all nominees are unsatisfactory to the director, the board shall continue to submit lists of nominees until the director has made a selection. Any vacancy in the office of the public member of the board shall be filled by appointment by the director from the nominee or nominees similarly qualified submitted by the board. The public member of each board shall represent the interests of the general public in all matters coming before the board and shall have the same voting and other rights and immunities as other members of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 188.)
-------------------------------------------

62306.

The term of office of each member of a regional advisory board or a local advisory board shall be two years.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62307.

The director may remove any member from a local or a regional advisory board if he finds, after a hearing, that such member is guilty of nonfeasance or malfeasance in office.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62308.

The director may appoint a member to fill any vacancy on a local or a regional advisory board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62309.

Each regional advisory board and each local advisory board may meet in regular session each month, and each member shall be allowed twenty dollars ($20) per diem and mileage at the rate of fifteen cents ($0.15) per mile for attending such regular meetings, and any other meeting or conference which is called or authorized by the director within or outside of the boundaries of this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62310.

Any regional or local advisory board may, with the previous approval of the director, employ such personnel as may be necessary in the performance of its duties and shall adopt regulations for its conduct. Each such board shall submit a budget of its expenses to the director for his approval.

The funds to be used for the maintenance of each such board shall be paid from the proceeds of assessments and licenses which are paid to the director under the plan of any area which is represented upon verified claims that are presented by the board to the director. A regional or local advisory board shall not incur any expenses except those for per diem and mileage, unless the expenses are approved by the director.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62311.

Regional and local advisory boards shall review with the director the methods which are to be used in determining producer costs, and aid the director in the selection of the level of production which is necessary to meet the requirements of Section 62062 with respect to producer price minimums.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62312.

For purposes of developing uniformity of administration as between marketing areas in which producer advisory boards have been appointed, the director shall call together representatives of regional and local advisory boards from time to time to advise him as to the relationships in producer costs among the marketing areas, and may designate such representatives as the statewide committee of producer advisory boards.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62313.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that producers of market milk appointed to the regional advisory boards pursuant to this article are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that such representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to such advisory boards, the particular industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Actions and Penalties [62401. - 62403.]

62401.

The violation of any provision of this chapter, or of any provision of any stabilization and marketing plan, or of any regulation adopted under this chapter, is a misdemeanor which is punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment. The amount of penalty which is assessed pursuant to this section on each count of violation shall be based upon the nature of the violation and the seriousness of the effect of such violation upon effectuation of the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62402.

Any person who violates this chapter, any provision of any stabilization and marketing plan, or any regulation adopted under this chapter, is liable civilly in an amount not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each and every violation. That penalty is to be recovered by the director in any court of competent jurisdiction. The amount of penalty which is assessed pursuant to this section on each count of violation shall be based upon the nature of the violation and the seriousness of the effect of the violation upon effectuation of the purposes and provisions of this chapter. The court may, in addition to the civil penalty, award reasonably incurred investigative and enforcement costs, and attorney’s fees, to the director. The court may also award attorney’s fees to any person successfully defending a civil action under this section. In any civil action initiated by the director under this section, the director shall join in the action, and assert civil penalties against, all parties participating in the commission of the unlawful practice. Any sum which is recovered under this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 522, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

62403.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation, or the threatened violation, of any provision of this chapter, any provision of any stabilization and marketing plan, or any regulation adopted under this chapter in the superior court in the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur. There may be enjoined in one proceeding any number of defendants alleged to be violating the same provisions, orders, or regulations, although their properties, interests, residences, or places of business may be in several counties and the violations separate and distinct. Any proceeding which is brought pursuant to this section shall be governed in all other respects by the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Milk Producers Security Trust Fund [62500. - 62667.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Declaration [62500. - 62508.]

62500.

The production and distribution of milk, and the components thereof, is hereby declared to be a business affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health and welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 55.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62501.

It is hereby declared that the dairy industry is a paramount agricultural industry of the state, and the normal processes of producing and marketing milk are enterprises of vast economic importance to the state and of vital importance to the consuming public which should be safeguarded and protected in the public interest. The Legislature finds that the marketing of milk requires producers to receive prompt payment. It is the policy of this state to protect producers against loss of payment for bulk milk. The public interest requires the establishment of a system to provide payment security for producers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1074, Sec. 25.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62503.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any article, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, or phrase of this chapter is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid as applied to any person or as applied under certain circumstances, that decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining provisions of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any other person or under any other circumstances.

The Legislature hereby declares that it would have enacted each article, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, or phrase of this chapter regardless of the fact that one or more other articles, sections, subdivisions, sentences, clauses, or phrases are declared unconstitutional or invalid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 55.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62505.

This chapter does not preclude any producer from bringing any action against any handler in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 55.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62506.

In order to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, the Milk Producers Security Trust Fund is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 55.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62507.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that producers and handlers appointed to the Milk Producers Security Trust Fund Board are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to the board, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 55.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62508.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Norman S. Waters-Ruben S. Ayala Milk Producers’ Security Act of 1987.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1074, Sec. 27.   Effective September 24, 1987.)